Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF14.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1342XS (3) 91 jda/jh S.F. 14 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 256.231 Comprehensive transition 1 and postsecondary program scholarship program. 2 1. If moneys are appropriated by the general assembly for 3 a fiscal year for the purpose provided in this section, the 4 college student aid commission shall, in consultation with 5 the division of vocational rehabilitation services of the 6 department of workforce development, develop and administer 7 a scholarship program to provide scholarships to individuals 8 with intellectual, developmental, or learning disabilities who 9 are at least eighteen years of age and who are enrolled in 10 a comprehensive transition and postsecondary program in this 11 state that has been approved by the United States department 12 of education, to help offset the cost associated with the 13 comprehensive transition and postsecondary programâs tuition 14 and fees. 15 2. The amount awarded to an individual under this section 16 shall not exceed five thousand dollars. 17 3. The college student aid commission, in consultation 18 with the division of vocational rehabilitation services of 19 the department of workforce development, shall establish the 20 evaluation criteria to be used in evaluating applications for 21 scholarships submitted under this section. Priority shall be 22 given to applicants who are residents of Iowa. 23 4. The college student aid commission, in consultation 24 with the division of vocational rehabilitation services of the 25 department of workforce development, shall adopt rules pursuant 26 to chapter 17A to administer this section. 27 5. A comprehensive transition and postsecondary program 28 scholarship program fund is established in the state treasury. 29 The fund shall be administered by the college student aid 30 commission, in consultation with the division of vocational 31 rehabilitation services of the department of workforce 32 development, and shall consist of moneys appropriated by the 33 general assembly and any other moneys received by the college 34 student aid commission for deposit in the fund. The moneys in 35 -1- LSB 1342XS (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 S.F. 14 the fund are appropriated to the college student aid commission 1 for the comprehensive transition and postsecondary program 2 scholarship program. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in 3 the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to 4 the general fund of the state but shall remain available for 5 expenditure for the comprehensive transition and postsecondary 6 program scholarship program for subsequent fiscal years. 7 Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or 8 earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. 9